Washington statutes.
RCW 35.59.030

Acquisition, construction, operation, etc., of community centers authorized.

Any municipality is authorized either individually or jointly with any other municipality or municipalities or any governmental agency or agencies, or any combination thereof, to acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant, to lease as lessee, and to construct, install, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of multi-purpose community centers located within such municipality, and to pay for any investigations and any engineering, planning, financial, legal and professional services incident to the development and operation of such multi-purpose community centers.

[ 1967 c 110 s 3.]